public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX xB er évelo/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB ver éelo/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB er éa/J5j5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB ver éa/J5j5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB er éelo/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB r ndo/PlP7 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB er éndogelo/Ql [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB er éndogeƚo/Q7 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB r nde/PlP7 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xB er éndegelo/Ql [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xB er éndegeƚo/Q7 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xB r nto/PlP7 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB er éntogelo/Ql [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB er èntogelo/Ql [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB 0 à/J5j5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xB 0 aƚo/i5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB 0 alo/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB 0 ave/J7j7 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 íselo/I7 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er è/SlS7 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xB er é/SlS7 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xB er ègelo/Dl [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + è
SFX xB er égelo/Dl [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + é
SFX xB er í/SlS7 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xB er ígelo/Dl [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xB er éntogeƚo/Q7 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB er èntogeƚo/Q7 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB 0 íseƚo/i7 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er ègeƚo/D7 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + è
SFX xB er égeƚo/D7 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + é
SFX xB er ígeƚo/D7 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xB er évemi/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)e
SFX xB er évatu/I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a, 2s=3
SFX xB 0 oni/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + ron
SFX xB 0 eni/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rén
SFX xB er arémoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xB er arímoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xB er arà/J5j5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xB er araƚo/i5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB er aralo/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver eroni/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + ron
SFX xB ver ereni/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rén
SFX xB ver arémoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xB ver arímoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xB ver arà/J5j5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver araƚo/i5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver aralo/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB er aràvemi/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràvei/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràvetu/I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràveu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràe/J1 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràemi/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràe/J2 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràei/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràe/J3 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràetu/I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràe/J4 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràeu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er arave/J7j7 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aríselo/I7 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aríseƚo/i7 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e

# vèrbi -ér inregolari: (re)aver
SFX xC Y 8
SFX xC aver vepion aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xC aver vepione aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xC aver vepien aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xC aver vepiene aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xC aver vepié aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e) = T5
SFX xC aver vepie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xC aver vepie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xC aver vepie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
