public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.dic
aver/t2P0PlP7Q0QlQ7xBxC.0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ʼver/P0PlP7Q0QlQ7xB	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple st:aver
ʼer/P0PlP7Q0QlQ7xB	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple st:aver
gaver/t2P0PlP7Q0QlQ7xB.0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
